src/fst/morphology/affixes/abbreviations.lexc
!! # Abbreviation affixes

!! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

!! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
!! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
!! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

! Noun or not
LEXICON ab-dot-trab
  ab-dot-noun-trab ; ! assuming noun
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-dot-trnumab
  ab-dot-noun-trnumab ; ! assuming noun
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-trab
  ab-noun-trab ; ! assuming noun
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-trnumab
  ab-noun-trnumab ; ! assuming noun
!!= **@LEXNAME@**

! The nouns
LEXICON ab-noun-itrab
 +Gram/IAbbr: ab-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-noun-trab
 +Gram/TAbbr: ab-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-noun-trnumab
 +Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-noun
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
                                        ab-nodot-noun ;
                               +Use/NG: ab-dot-noun   ;

! The adjectives
!     LEXICON ab-adj-itrab +Gram/IAbbr: ab-adj        ;
!     LEXICON ab-adj-trab  +Gram/TAbbr: ab-adj        ;
!LEXICON ab-adj
!                                       ab-nodot-adj  ;
!                              +Use/NG: ab-dot-adj    ;

! The adverbs
!   LEXICON ab-adv-itrab   +Gram/IAbbr: ab-adv        ;
!   LEXICON ab-adv-trab    +Gram/TAbbr: ab-adv        ;
! LEXICON ab-adv-numnoab  +Gram/NoAbbr: ab-adv        ;
!LEXICON ab-adv
!                                       ab-nodot-adv  ;
!                              +Use/NG: ab-dot-adv    ;

! The numerals

!! ### Lexicons without final period
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-itrab
 +Gram/IAbbr: ab-nodot-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-trab
 +Gram/TAbbr: ab-nodot-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
    +N+Abbr: nodot-infl ;

!LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
!   +A+Abbr: nodot-infl ;


!LEXICON ab-nodot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
! +Num+Abbr: nodot-infl ;

!! ### Lexicons with final period

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-itrab
 +Gram/IAbbr: ab-dot-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-trab
 +Gram/TAbbr: ab-dot-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-trnumab
 +Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-noun ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-dot-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +N+Abbr: dot-infl ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adj-trab
 +Gram/TAbbr: ab-dot-adj ;
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
LEXICON ab-dot-adj   !!= * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
  +A+Abbr: dot-infl ;


!LEXICON ab-dot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
! +V+Abbr: DOT      ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
! +V+Abbr: #        ; ! No period.
           !R-      ;

LEXICON nodot-infl   !!= * **@CODE@**
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
  #  ;
  R- ;

LEXICON dot-infl   !!= * **@CODE@**
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
  DOT ;

LEXICON DOT   !!= * **@CODE@** - Adds the dot to dotted abbreviations.
!!= **@LEXNAME@**
!! we also allow different variations of dotted abbreviations at
!! the end of the sentence (especially for tokenisers)
!! * "kvæð." gets analysed as `"kvæð" ABBR Gram/IAbbr N Abbr`
!! in tokeniser mode also:
!! * "kvæð." -> `"ABBR Gram/IAbbr N Abbr` + `"." CLB` to account for sentence
!!    final kvæð with no extra full stop.
!! * also `"kvæða" V Imp Sg` + `"." CLB` due to
!!   homonymy.
!! Same treatment is done with two and three full stops after abbreviation in
!! the end of the sentence:
!! * "kvæð.." -> `"su" Adv Abbr` + `"." CLB Err/Orth`
!! * "kvæð..." -> `"su" Adv Abbr` + `"..." CLB`

                                                      +Use/-PMatch.:.  #          ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts
                                             +Err/Orth+Use/-PMatch.:.. #          ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts

! Split the abbr + full stop in two segments, but only when using pmatch:
                  < "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {.} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 >    #          ;

! Make a regular ABBR analysis AND backtrack to find alternative analyses:
! NB! Not all backtracking will give alternative analyses, and those
! cases will give a warning about missing substring analysis. The warnings
! can be ignored.
                    < "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. >    #          ;

! Error variants for cases with two full stops:
  < "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {.} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 "+Err/Orth":"." >    #          ;
    < "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. "+Err/Orth":"." >    #          ;

! folded three full-stops?
                < "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {...} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 >    #          ;
         < "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:"." 0:%. 0:%. >    #          ;

! Gives:
!$ echo 'kvæð.' \
!| hfst-tokenise -g tools/tokenisers/tokeniser-gramcheck-gt-desc.pmhfst
!"<kvæð.>"
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"kvæð" ABBR Gram/IAbbr N Abbr <W:0.0> "<kvæð>"
!	"kvæð" ABBR Gram/IAbbr N Abbr <W:0.0>
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"kvæða" V Imp Sg <W:0.0> "<kvæð>"
!:\n
!
! which is exactly what we want. After mwedis and cg-mwesplit, this will be
! reformatted as:
!
!"<kvæð.>"
!	"kvæð" ABBR Gram/IAbbr N Abbr <W:0.0>
!:\n
!
! hm - with lost CLB analysis. That is a bug, and must be looked into.

! =================

!                            LEXICON ab-dot-adv-itrab   +Gram/IAbbr:   ab-dot-adv ;
!                            LEXICON ab-dot-adv-trab    +Gram/TAbbr:   ab-dot-adv ;
!                         LEXICON ab-dot-adv-trnumab +Gram/TNumAbbr:   ab-dot-adv ;
!LEXICON ab-dot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
!                                                         +Adv+Abbr:   DOT        ; ! Adv without case.

!                          LEXICON ab-dot-num-itrab +Num+Gram/IAbbr:   ab-dot-num ;
!                          LEXICON ab-dot-num-trab  +Num+Gram/TAbbr:   ab-dot-num ;
!LEXICON ab-dot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
!                                                         +Num+Abbr:   dot-infl   ;

!                            LEXICON ab-dot-cc-itrab +CC+Gram/IAbbr:   ab-dot-cc  ;
!                            LEXICON ab-dot-cc-trab  +CC+Gram/TAbbr:   ab-dot-cc  ;
!LEXICON ab-dot-cc   !!= * __@CODE@__
!                                                          +CC+Abbr:   DOT        ;
