src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON ITRAB
mðr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
mðn ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
mió ab-noun-trab ; ! 20 mió kr. / 20 mió. kr.
osfr ab-noun-itrab ;
v.m ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
cm ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
Tórsh ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
málfr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
rómv ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
sms ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
dj ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
kirkj ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
løgfr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
o ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
bókm ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
sjónl ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
móts ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
Eftf ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
Fr.p ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
I.N.D ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
Kr.% f ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
Lt ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
a.s ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
d.% y ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
daa ab-dot-noun-itrab ; !dekar
e.% l ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
e.f ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
eflg ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
ell.% likn ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
f.Kr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
fr.p ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
ib ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
jap ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
km/t+Sem/Amount:km/t ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
kr.f ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
m ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
m.% o.% h ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
m.fl ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
m.u.h ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
mió ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
mno ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
mrd ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
nov ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
o.% l ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
o.% s.% fr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
o.h ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
o.likn ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
o.s.v ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
osv ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
osv+Err/Orth:osv ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
p.% m ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
p.a ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
p.r ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
q.% s ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
red.% anm ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
s.u ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
sek ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
sp ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
kwh ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
c ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
g ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
k ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
LEXICON TRNUMAB
bls ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Ad		ab-dot-trnumab ;                                      !
Apd		ab-dot-trnumab ;                                      !
Bnr		ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
Gnr		ab-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
Kommunenr	ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
O.nr		ab-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
P.b ab-trnumab ;
Pb              ab-noun-trnumab ; ! Postbox
Pb ab-trnumab ;
Postnr		ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Rt		ab-dot-trnumab ;                                      !
Rv ab-trnumab ;
S.nr		ab-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
a.% D ab-trnumab ;
a.D ab-trnumab ;
alm		ab-dot-trnumab ;                                      !
b.c		ab-dot-trnumab ;  !b.c. 18-22
bnr		ab-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
fnr		ab-noun-trnumab ;
gnr		ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
gnr ab-trnumab ;
j		ab-dot-trnumab ;                                      !
jnr		ab-dot-trnumab ;                                      !
kap		ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
kr		ab-trnumab ;                                          !
dkr ab-trnumab ;
kr ab-trnumab ;
lnr ab-trnumab ;
maks ab-trnumab ;
mill ab-trnumab ;
mob		ab-noun-trnumab ;
fartlf ab-noun-trnumab ;
mobiltlf ab-trnumab ;
nkr ab-trnumab ;
nr		ab-noun-trnumab ; ! Nr nicht                          !
nr ab-trnumab ;
op ab-trnumab ;
oppg ab-trnumab ;
p.b ab-trnumab ;
pb ab-trnumab ;
pgf ab-trnumab ;
pkt ab-trnumab ;
rv ab-trnumab ;
stk ab-trnumab ;
tab	ab-trnumab ; ! or: Add capital Tab.               !
tlf		ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
tlf ab-trnumab ;
vnr		ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;                                 !
viðv. ab-trnumab ;
vetrar-OL ab-trnumab ;
LEXICON TRAB
adr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
postadr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
m% a ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
árg ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
jbr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
leig ab-dot-noun-trab ;
s ab-dot-noun-trab ;
smb ab-dot-noun-trab ;
smbr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
matr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
mk ab-dot-noun-trab ;
m.ø ab-dot-adj-trab ;
viðm ab-dot-noun-trab ;	
tús ab-noun-trab ;
sbrt ab-dot-adj-trab ;
C ab-trab ;
E ab-trab ;
G ab-trab ;
J ab-trab ;
L ab-trab ;
NB ab-trab ;
Ot.% prp ab-trab ;
Pfg ab-trab ;
S.% u ab-trab ;
Sp ab-trab ;
Su ab-trab ;
V ab-trab ;
Z ab-trab ;
am ab-trab ;
arab ab-trab ;
austr ab-trab ;
balt ab-trab ;
biol ab-trab ;
brig ab-trab ;
cand.mag ab-trab ;
cand.theol ab-trab ;
cm3 ab-trab ;
real ab-trab ;
co ab-trab ;
d.% m ab-trab ;
d.e ab-trab ;
d.å ab-trab ;
dim ab-trab ;
dr ab-trab ;
dr.theol ab-trab ;
dvs ab-trab ;
eksp.sj ab-trab ;
ev ab-trab ;
f.% m ab-trab ;
f.t ab-trab ;
fig ab-trab ;
fr ab-trab ;
genr.lt ab-trab ;
gt ab-trab ;
imp ab-trab ;
int ab-trab ;
k.s ab-trab ;
kl ab-trab ;
kurd ab-trab ;
m ab-trab ;
m.a.o ab-trab ;
mht ab-trab ;
nbr ab-trab ;
odont ab-trab ;
p ab-trab ;
docx ab-trab ;
pr ab-trab ;
psyk ab-trab ;
s.a ab-trab ;
sgt ab-trab ;
st ab-trab ;
st.theol ab-trab ;
t.% d ab-dot-trab ;
t.% o.% m ab-dot-trab ;
t.d ab-dot-trab ;
t.h ab-dot-trab ;
t.v ab-dot-trab ;
th ab-dot-trab ;
tils ab-dot-trab ;
tir ab-dot-trab ;
tv ab-dot-trab ;
tyrk ab-dot-trab ;
u.% s ab-dot-trab ;
u.s ab-dot-trab ;
ub ab-dot-trab ;
ult ab-dot-trab ;
ungd ab-dot-trab ;
utg ab-dot-trab ;
uttr ab-dot-trab ;
v.% h.% a ab-dot-trab ;
v.h.a ab-dot-trab ;
vha ab-dot-trab ;
Å ab-trab ;
HF ab-trab ;
KÍ ab-trab ;
útg ab-dot-trab ;
sept ab-dot-trab ;
lækn ab-dot-trab ;
Suð ab-dot-trab ;
ítr ab-dot-trab ;
søg ab-dot-trab ;
sjóm ab-dot-trab ;
fisk ab-dot-trab ;
alisfr ab-dot-trab ;
jarðfr ab-dot-trab ;
seyðal ab-dot-trab ;
niðr ab-dot-trab ;
kortsp ab-dot-trab ;
teld ab-dot-trab ;
bjarg ab-dot-trab ;
bún ab-dot-trab ;
barn ab-dot-trab ;
ravm ab-dot-trab ;
veðurfr ab-dot-trab ;
Sa ab-dot-trab ;
landafr ab-dot-trab ;
óvand ab-dot-trab ;
speis ab-dot-trab ;
mjólk ab-dot-trab ;
útv ab-dot-trab ;
heimsp ab-dot-trab ;
Hvlb ab-dot-trab ;
góðn ab-dot-trab ;
skr ab-dot-trab ;
Mikld ab-dot-trab ;
uppr ab-dot-trab ;
Vestm ab-dot-trab ;
Sand ab-dot-trab ;
Gásad ab-dot-trab ;
vanl ab-dot-trab ;
mvg ab-dot-trab ;
djfr ab-dot-trab ;
Trølln ab-dot-trab ;
Saks ab-dot-trab ;
